src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-2A-rydskhed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - râdsǩed: # Verb '/hengähtää' - full paradigm
     râdsǩed+V+Inf: râdsǩed
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: râdskam
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: râdskak
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rââddask
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: râdsǩep
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: râdsǩeʹped
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: râdsǩe 
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: râdsǩet
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: rââddask
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: râdsǩem
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: râdsǩiǩ
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: râdsǩi
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: râdsǩim
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: râdsǩid
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: râdsǩe
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: râdsǩeš
     râdsǩed+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: râdskam
     râdsǩed+V+Pot+Sg1: râdsǩeʹžem
     râdsǩed+V+Pot+Sg2: râdsǩeʹžiǩ
     râdsǩed+V+Pot+Sg3: râdsǩež
     râdsǩed+V+Pot+Pl1: râdsǩeʹžep
     râdsǩed+V+Pot+Pl2: râdsǩeʹžid
     râdsǩed+V+Pot+Pl3: râdsǩeʹže
     râdsǩed+V+Pot+Sg4: râdsǩeʹžet
     râdsǩed+V+Pot+ConNeg: râdsǩeʹže
     râdsǩed+V+Cond+Sg1: râdsǩeʹčem
     râdsǩed+V+Cond+Sg2: râdsǩeʹčiǩ
     râdsǩed+V+Cond+Sg3: râdsǩeʹči
     râdsǩed+V+Cond+Pl1: râdsǩeʹčim
     râdsǩed+V+Cond+Pl2: râdsǩeʹčid
     râdsǩed+V+Cond+Pl3: râdsǩeʹče
     râdsǩed+V+Cond+Sg4: râdsǩeʹčeš
     râdsǩed+V+Cond+ConNeg: râdsǩeʹče
     râdsǩed+V+Imprt+Sg2: rââddask
     râdsǩed+V+Imprt+Sg3: râdskââǥǥas
     râdsǩed+V+Imprt+Pl1: râdskâkap
     râdsǩed+V+Imprt+Pl2: râdsǩeʹǩed
     râdsǩed+V+Imprt+Pl3: râdskâkaz
     râdsǩed+V+Imprt+ConNegII: râdskuku
     râdsǩed+V+Actio+Ess: râdsǩeʹmmen
     râdsǩed+V+Actio: râdsǩem
     râdsǩed+V+Act+PrsPrc: râdsǩeei
     râdsǩed+V+Act+PrfPrc: râdskam
     râdsǩed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: râdsǩum
     râdsǩed+V+VAbess: râdsǩeǩâni
     râdsǩed+V+Ger+Ess: râdsǩeen
     râdsǩed+V+Ger+Instr: râdsǩeeʹl
     râdsǩed+V+Der/musj+N+Sg+Nom: râdskummuš
